District of Columbia statutes.
42-2403

Duties of lender.

A lender shall, at or before loan closing, cause disbursement of loan funds to a settlement agent. A lender shall not receive or charge any interest on a loan until disbursement of loan funds and loan closing have occurred, and shall not require payment of any interest in advance. For purposes of this section, the term “interest” means any compensation directly or indirectly imposed by a lender for the extension of credit for the use or forbearance of money as defined in § 28-3311, except that for purposes of this section, the term “interest” shall not include any loan fee, origination fee, service and carrying charge, investigator’s fee, or point under § 28-3301(e).

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-187, § 4, 33 DCR 7681

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2803.